assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.aff
SFX  erar rese erar
SFX  ercar rquense ercar
SFX  ercar rquese ercar
SFX  ergir rjanse ergir
SFX  ergir rjase ergir
SFX  gir jmonos gir
SFX  ervar rvense ervar
SFX  ervar rvese ervar
SFX  escar squense escar
SFX  escar squese escar
SFX  estar stense estar
SFX  estar stese estar
SFX  eter tanse eter
SFX  eter tase eter
SFX  evar vense evar
SFX  evar vese evar
SFX  ever vanse ever
SFX  ever vase ever
SFX  ezclar zclense ezclar
SFX  ezclar zclese ezclar
SFX  ibir banse ibir
SFX  ibir base ibir
SFX  ibrar brense ibrar
SFX  ibrar brese ibrar
SFX  icar quense icar
SFX  icar quese icar
SFX  idar dense idar
SFX  idar dese idar
SFX  idir danse idir
SFX  idir dase idir
SFX  igar guense igar
SFX  igar guese igar
SFX  igir janse igir
SFX  igir jase igir
SFX  ignar gnense ignar
SFX  ignar gnese ignar
SFX  ijar jense ijar
SFX  ijar jese ijar
SFX  illar llense illar
SFX  illar llese illar
SFX  imar mense imar
SFX  imar mese imar
SFX  impiar mpiense impiar
SFX  impiar mpiese impiar
SFX  inar nense inar
SFX  inar nese inar
SFX  incar nquense incar
SFX  incar nquese incar
SFX  intar ntense intar
SFX  intar ntese intar
SFX  irar rense irar
SFX  irar rese irar
SFX  itar tense itar
SFX  itar tese itar
SFX  itir tanse itir
SFX  itir tase itir
SFX  izar cense izar
SFX  izar cese izar
SFX  ocar quense ocar
SFX  ocar quese ocar
SFX  ochar chense ochar
SFX  ochar chese ochar
SFX  odar dense odar
SFX  odar dese odar
SFX  oder danse oder
SFX  oder dase oder
SFX  oger janse oger
SFX  oger jase oger
SFX  ojar jense ojar
SFX  ojar jese ojar
SFX  olar lense olar
SFX  olar lese olar
SFX  omar mense omar
SFX  omar mese omar
SFX  ombrar mbrense ombrar
SFX  ombrar mbrese ombrar
SFX  omer manse omer
SFX  omer mase omer
SFX  omprar mprense omprar
SFX  omprar mprese omprar
SFX  onar nense onar
SFX  onar nese onar
SFX  ontar ntense ontar
SFX  ontar ntese ontar
SFX  orar rense orar
SFX  orar rese orar
SFX  orcar rquense orcar
SFX  orcar rquese orcar
SFX  ormar rmense ormar
SFX  ormar rmese ormar
SFX  orrer rranse orrer
SFX  orrer rrase orrer
SFX  ortar rtense ortar
SFX  ortar rtese ortar
SFX  otar tense otar
SFX  otar tese otar
SFX  oyar yense oyar
SFX  oyar yese oyar
SFX  ubir banse ubir
SFX  ubir base ubir
SFX  ubrir branse ubrir
SFX  ubrir brase ubrir
SFX  uchar chense uchar
SFX  uchar chese uchar
SFX  udar dense udar
SFX  udar dese udar
SFX  ulpar lpense ulpar
SFX  ulpar lpese ulpar
SFX  ultar ltense ultar
SFX  ultar ltese ultar
SFX  umar mense umar
SFX  umar mese umar
SFX  umbar mbense umbar
SFX  umbar mbese umbar
SFX  umbrar mbrense umbrar
SFX  umbrar mbrese umbrar
SFX  umplir mplanse umplir
SFX  umplir mplase umplir
SFX  unciar nciense unciar
SFX  unciar nciese unciar
SFX  undir ndanse undir
SFX  undir ndase undir
SFX  untar ntense untar
SFX  untar ntese untar
SFX  upar pense upar
SFX  upar pese upar
SFX  urar rense urar
SFX  urar rese urar
SFX  urnar rnense urnar
SFX  urnar rnese urnar
SFX  uscar squense uscar
SFX  uscar squese uscar

SFX  Y 55
SFX  aer iganse aer
SFX  aer igase aer
SFX  aer aigmonos aer
SFX  ecer zcanse ecer
SFX  ecer zcase ecer
SFX  cer zcmonos ecer
SFX  egar iguense egar
SFX  egar iguese egar
SFX  ar umonos gar
SFX  endar indense endar
SFX  endar indese endar
SFX  ar monos [^gz]ar
SFX  ender indanse ender
SFX  ender indase ender
SFX  er monos [^ac]er
SFX  entar intense entar
SFX  entar intese entar
SFX  erder irdanse erder
SFX  erder irdase erder
SFX  errar irrense errar
SFX  errar irrese errar
SFX  ertar irtense ertar
SFX  ertar irtese ertar
SFX  erter irtanse erter
SFX  erter irtase erter
SFX  iar ense iar
SFX  iar ese iar
SFX  obar ubense obar
SFX  obar ubese obar
SFX  olar ulense olar
SFX  olar ulese olar
SFX  oltar ultense oltar
SFX  oltar ultese oltar
SFX  olver ulvanse olver
SFX  olver ulvase olver
SFX  ontar untense ontar
SFX  ontar untese ontar
SFX  ontrar untrense ontrar
SFX  ontrar untrese ontrar
SFX  ordar urdense ordar
SFX  ordar urdese ordar
SFX  orzar urcense orzar
SFX  orzar urcese orzar
SFX  zar cmonos zar
SFX  ostar ustense ostar
SFX  ostar ustese ostar
SFX  ostrar ustrense ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustrese ostrar
SFX  over uvanse over
SFX  over uvase over
SFX  uar ense uar
SFX  uar ese uar
SFX  unir nanse unir
SFX  unir nase unir
SFX  ir monos ir

SFX  Y 66
SFX  cer gmonos acer
SFX  acer ganse acer
SFX  acer gase acer
SFX  er igmonos aer
SFX  aer iganse aer
SFX  aer igase aer
SFX  er gmonos [ln]er
SFX  aler lganse aler
SFX  aler lgase aler
SFX  ir gmonos [ln]ir
SFX  alir lganse alir
SFX  alir lgase alir
SFX  ecir igmonos ecir
SFX  ecir ganse ecir
SFX  ecir gase ecir
SFX  edir idmonos edir
SFX  edir danse edir
SFX  edir dase edir
SFX  eguir igmonos eguir
SFX  eguir ganse eguir
SFX  eguir gase eguir
SFX  er imonos er
SFX  er anse er
SFX  er ase er
SFX  ener nganse ener
SFX  ener ngase ener
SFX  enir nganse enir
SFX  enir ngase enir
SFX  entir intanse entir
SFX  entir intase entir
SFX  entir intmonos entir
SFX  eir imonos eir
SFX  eir anse eir
SFX  eir ase eir
SFX  er anse ver
SFX  er ase ver
SFX  r monos ver
SFX  erir iranse erir
SFX  erir irase erir
SFX  erir irmonos erir
SFX  ervir irvmonos ervir
SFX  ervir rvanse ervir
SFX  ervir rvase ervir
SFX  ertir irtanse ertir
SFX  ertir irtase ertir
SFX  ertir irtmonos ertir
SFX  estir istmonos estir
SFX  estir stanse estir
SFX  estir stase estir
SFX  etir itmonos etir
SFX  etir tanse etir
SFX  etir tase etir
SFX  oner nganse oner
SFX  oner ngase oner
SFX  orir uranse orir
SFX  orir urase orir
SFX  orir urmonos orir
SFX  ormir urmanse ormir
SFX  ormir urmase ormir
SFX  ormir urmmonos ormir
SFX  ucir zcanse ucir
SFX  ucir zcase ucir
SFX  cir zcmonos ucir
SFX  uir yanse uir
SFX  uir yase uir
SFX  ir ymonos uir
